Indiana, session 2026, SB146.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-2-0.6, AS ADDED BY P.L.55-2023, SECTION
1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 0.6. The general assembly declares that it is the continuing
policy of the state that decisions concerning Indiana's electric
generation resource mix, energy infrastructure, and electric service
ratemaking constructs must consider each of the following attributes of
electric utility service, with affordability being the most important:
(1) Reliability, including:
(A) the adequacy of electric utility service, including the
ability of the electric system to supply the aggregate electrical
demand and energy requirements of end use customers at all
times, taking into account:
(i) scheduled; and
(ii) reasonably expected unscheduled;
outages of system elements; and
(B) the operating reliability of the electric system, including
the ability of the electric system to withstand sudden
2026 IN 146—LS 6523/DI 119


disturbances such as electric short circuits or unanticipated
loss of system components.
(2) Affordability, including ratemaking constructs that result in
retail electric utility service that is affordable and competitive
across residential, commercial, and industrial customer classes.
(3) Resiliency, including the ability of the electric system or its
components to:
(A) adapt to changing conditions; and
(B) withstand and rapidly recover from disruptions or
off-nominal events.
(4) Stability, including the ability of the electric system to:
(A) maintain a state of equilibrium during:
(i) normal and abnormal conditions; or
(ii) disturbances; and
(B) deliver a stable source of electricity, in which frequency
and voltage are maintained within defined parameters,
consistent with industry standards.
(5) Environmental sustainability, including:
(A) the impact of environmental regulations on the cost of
providing electric utility service; and
(B) demand from consumers for environmentally sustainable
sources of electric generation.
SECTION 2. IC 8-1-39-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.89-2019,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) Subject to subsection (d), (f), a public utility
that provides electric or gas utility service may file with the
commission rate schedules establishing a TDSIC that will allow the
periodic automatic adjustment of the public utility's basic rates and
charges to provide for timely recovery of eighty percent (80%) of
approved capital expenditures and TDSIC costs. The petition must:
(1) use the customer class revenue allocation factor based on firm
load approved in the public utility's most recent retail base rate
case order;
(2) include:
(A) the public utility's TDSIC plan for eligible transmission,
distribution, and storage system improvements; and
(B) an executive summary of the public utility's TDSIC
plan that provides:
(i) a summary description of the eligible transmission,
distribution, and storage system improvements;
(ii) the proposed cost of the improvements; and
(iii) the public utility's justification for the improvements
2026 IN 146—LS 6523/DI 119


and the cost of the improvements; and
(3) identify projected effects of the plan described in subdivision
(2) (2)(A) on retail rates and charges.
(b) When a public utility files a petition under subsection (a):
(1) the public utility shall:
(A) provide a copy of the petition to the office of the utility
consumer counselor; when the petition is filed with the
commission. and
(B) publish the TDSIC plan conspicuously on the public
utility's website; and
(2) the commission shall publish the TDSIC plan
conspicuously on the commission's website.
(b) (c) The public utility shall update the public utility's TDSIC plan
under subsection (a)(2) (a)(2)(A) at least annually. An update may
include a petition for approval of:
(1) a targeted economic development project under section 11 of
this chapter; or
(2) transmission, distribution, and storage system improvements
not described in the public utility's TDSIC plan most recently
approved by the commission under section 10 of this chapter.
(d) When a public utility files an update under subsection (c):
(1) the public utility shall publish the update conspicuously on
the public utility's website; and
(2) the commission shall publish the update conspicuously on
the commission's website.
(c) (e) A public utility that recovers capital expenditures and TDSIC
costs under subsection (a) shall defer the remaining twenty percent
(20%) of approved capital expenditures and TDSIC costs, including
depreciation, allowance for funds used during construction, and post in
service carrying costs. and Upon the public utility's completion of
the eligible transmission, distribution, and storage system
improvements included in the TDSIC plan, the public utility shall
recover those capital expenditures and TDSIC costs as part of the next
general rate case that the public utility files with the commission.
(d) (f) Except as provided in section 15 of this chapter, a public
utility may not file a petition under subsection (a) within nine (9)
months after the date on which the commission issues an order
changing the public utility's basic rates and charges with respect to the
same type of utility service.
(e) (g) A public utility that implements a TDSIC under this chapter
shall, before the expiration of the public utility's approved TDSIC plan,
petition the commission for review and approval of the public utility's
2026 IN 146—LS 6523/DI 119


basic rates and charges with respect to the same type of utility service.
(f) (h) A public utility may file a petition under this section not more
than one (1) time every six (6) months.
(g) (i) Actual capital expenditures and TDSIC costs that exceed the
approved capital expenditures and TDSIC costs require specific
justification by the public utility and specific approval by the
commission before being authorized for recovery in customer rates.
SECTION 3. IC 8-1-39-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.89-2019,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) Not more than one hundred twenty (120)
days after a public utility files a petition under section 9 of this chapter,
the commission shall conduct a hearing and issue an order on the
petition.
(b) Not more than sixty (60) days after a public utility files a petition
under section 9 of this chapter, the office of the utility consumer
counselor and other intervenors, if any, may:
(1) examine the information of the public utility to confirm that
the proposed transmission, distribution, and storage system
improvements comply with this chapter; and
(2) report its findings to the commission.
(c) If the commission determines that the petition satisfies the
requirements of this chapter and the capital expenditures and TDSIC
costs are reasonable, the commission shall approve the petition,
including:
(1) capital expenditures;
(2) timely recovery of TDSIC costs, including costs associated
with a targeted economic development project, through a TDSIC;
and
(3) if requested, authority to defer TDSIC costs under section 9(c)
9(e) of this chapter.
(d) If the public utility has requested approval of new targeted
economic development projects or new transmission, distribution, and
storage system improvements under section 9(b) 9(c) of this chapter,
the commission's order must include the following:
(1) A finding of the best estimate of the cost of the new projects
or improvements.
(2) A determination whether public convenience and necessity
require or will require the new projects or improvements.
(3) A determination whether the estimated costs of the new
projects or improvements are justified by incremental benefits
attributable to the new projects or improvements.
If the commission determines that the public utility's new projects or
2026 IN 146—LS 6523/DI 119


improvements are reasonable, the commission shall approve the new
projects or improvements and authorize TDSIC treatment for the new
projects or improvements.
SECTION 4. IC 8-1-39-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.89-2019,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) The commission may not approve a TDSIC
that would result in an average aggregate increase in a public utility's
total retail revenues of more than two percent (2%) in a twelve (12)
month period. For purposes of this subsection, a public utility's total
retail revenues do not include TDSIC revenues associated with a
targeted economic development project.
(b) If a public utility incurs TDSIC costs under the public utility's
TDSIC plan that exceed the percentage increase in a TDSIC approved
by the commission, the public utility shall defer recovery of the TDSIC
costs as set forth in section 9(c) 9(e) of this chapter.
(c) For purposes of subsection (a), in the case of a public utility that
terminates a TDSIC plan under section 10(d) of this chapter, the
commission shall consider the combined twelve (12) month revenue
impact of the TDSIC approved under the terminated plan and the
TDSIC approved under any new TDSIC plan.
SECTION 5. IC 8-1-39-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.89-2019,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) For purposes of this chapter, the following
are not a general increase in basic rates and charges under
IC 8-1-2-42(a):
(1) The filing of a TDSIC.
(2) A change in a TDSIC.
(3) The deferral of depreciation expenses, operation and
maintenance expenses, property taxes, or post in service
allowance for funds used during construction under section 9(c)
9(e) of this chapter.
(b) This chapter does not limit:
(1) a public utility's ability to recover eligible transmission,
distribution, and storage system improvements in a general retail
rate case; or
(2) the commission's valuation of utility property under
IC 8-1-2-6.
2026 IN 146—LS 6523/DI 119